Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1242
Property tax
funds; use.

Funds generated from the property tax levy shall
only be used for purposes approved by representatives of two-thirds of the
member school districts in an educational service unit, representing a majority
of the students in the member school districts. The valuation of individual
school districts shall not be the only consideration
in determining the utilization of such funds received after July
1, 2010. Each educational service unit shall prepare and transmit a written
proposal of core services offerings and use of the property tax levy to all
member school districts. The member school districts through their designated
representatives shall indicate their approval or disapproval of the proposal
within thirty calendar days after receipt of the proposal, and failure to
so indicate within such time period shall be deemed approval of the proposal.

Laws 1997, LB 806, § 62;

Laws 1999, LB 363, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB1070, § 12;

Laws 2012, LB446, § 4.